Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-505
Person and public corporation, defined.

Wherever the term person is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573 and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean a person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation other than a county, village, city, city and county, or other political subdivision. Similarly, the words public corporation shall be taken to mean counties, cities and counties, villages, cities, school districts, irrigation districts, water districts, park districts, public power districts, public power and irrigation districts, and all governmental agencies clothed with the power of levying or providing for the levy of general or special taxes or special assessments.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(3), p. 525;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 278.